Utah statutes.
53A-11-908.   Extracurricular activities -- Prohibited conduct -- Reporting of violations -- Limitation of liability.

(1)  The Legislature recognizes that:

(a)  participation in student government and extracurricular activities may confer important educational and lifetime benefits upon students, and encourages school districts and charter schools to provide a variety of opportunities for all students to participate in such activities in meaningful ways;

(b)  there is no constitutional right to participate in these types of activities, and does not through this section or any other provision of law create such a right;

(c)  students who participate in student government and extracurricular activities, particularly competitive athletics, and the adult coaches, advisors, and assistants who direct those activities, become role models for others in the school and community;

(d)  these individuals often play major roles in establishing standards of acceptable behavior in the school and community, and establishing and maintaining the reputation of the school and the level of community confidence and support afforded the school; and

(e)  it is of the utmost importance that those involved in student government, whether as officers or advisors, and those involved in competitive athletics and related activities, whether students or staff, comply with all applicable laws and rules of behavior and conduct themselves at all times in a manner befitting their positions and responsibilities.

(2) (a)  The State Board of Education may, and local boards of education and governing boards of charter schools shall, adopt rules implementing this section that apply to both students and staff.

(b)  Those rules shall include prohibitions against the following types of conduct, while in the classroom, on school property, during school sponsored activities, or regardless of the location or circumstance, affecting a person or property described in Subsections 53A-11-902(5)(a) through (d):

(i)  use of foul, abusive, or profane language while engaged in school related activities;

(ii)  illicit use, possession, or distribution of controlled substances or drug paraphernalia, and the use, possession, or distribution of an electronic cigarette as defined in Section 76-10-101, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages contrary to law; and

(iii)  hazing, demeaning, or assaultive behavior, whether consensual or not, including behavior involving physical violence, restraint, improper touching, or inappropriate exposure of body parts not normally exposed in public settings, forced ingestion of any substance, or any act which would constitute a crime against a person or public order under Utah law.

(3) (a)  School employees who reasonably believe that a violation of this section may have occurred shall immediately report that belief to the school principal, district superintendent, or chief administrative officer of a charter school.

(b)  Principals who receive a report under Subsection (3)(a) shall submit a report of the alleged incident, and actions taken in response, to the district superintendent or the superintendent's designee within 10 working days after receipt of the report.

(c)  Failure of a person holding a professional certificate to report as required under this Subsection (3) constitutes an unprofessional practice.

(4)  Limitations of liability set forth under Section 53A-11-1004 apply to this section.

